Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.130

Recognition of out-of-state licensees.

The secretary may issue a nursing home administrator's license to anyone who holds a current administrator's license from another jurisdiction upon receipt of an application and complying with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined according to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280, if the standards for licensing in such other jurisdiction are substantially equivalent to those prevailing in this state, and that the applicant is otherwise qualified as determined by the board.

[ 1996 c 191 s 27; 1992 c 53 s 9; 1991 c 3 s 121; 1985 c 7 s 50; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 55; 1970 ex.s. c 57 s 13.]